Louisiana, session 2026, SB44.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 40:1379.1.6(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
7 §1379.1.6. Tactical medical professionals
8 * * *
9 E. The appointing law enforcement agency shall issue approve any firearm
10 or ammunition that the tactical medical professional carries in accordance with this
11 Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.